District of Columbia statutes.
32-1371

Unemployment profile report.

[Not funded].

Dec. 15, 2015, D.C. Law 21-38, § 2, 62 DCR 13742
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-38: Section 3 of D.C. Law 21-38 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.